West Virginia, session 2026, HB5194.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION. §18-5-55.  Ban on the usage of calculators and related devices for kindergarten through eighth grade students. Usage of calculators and math computational devices is prohibited in kindergarten through eighth grade classrooms for public schools and public charter schools in this state.